Ohio, session 136, SB265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 109.572 of the Revised Code be 9
amended to read as follows: 10
Sec. 109.572. (A)(1) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to 11
section 121.08, 3301.32, 3301.541, or 3319.39 of the Revised 12
Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of 13
this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in 14
the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the 15
superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and 16
investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the 17
manner described in division (B) of this section to determine 18
whether any information exists that indicates that the person 19
who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted 20
of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: 21

S. B. No. 265 Page 2
As Introduced
(a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 22
2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.06, 2903.08, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 23
2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.11, 24
2905.32, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 25
2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.19, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.25, 26
2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2911.01, 27
2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2919.12, 2919.22, 2919.24, 2919.25, 28
2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2923.17, 2923.21, 2923.42, 2925.02, 29
2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.041, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.13, 2925.22, 30
2925.23, 2925.24, 2925.31, 2925.32, 2925.36, 2925.37, or 3716.11 31
of the Revised Code, felonious sexual penetration in violation 32
of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code, a violation of 33
section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 34
1, 1996, a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that 35
would have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised 36
Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation been 37
committed prior to that date, or a violation of section 2925.11 38
of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug possession offense; 39
(b) A violation of an existing or former law of this 40
state, any other state, or the United States that is 41
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in 42
division (A)(1)(a) of this section; 43
(c) If the request is made pursuant to section 3319.39 of 44
the Revised Code for an applicant who is a teacher, any offense 45
specified under section 9.79 of the Revised Code or in section 46
3319.31 of the Revised Code. 47
(2) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 3712.09 or 48
3721.121 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed 49
pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of 50
fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in 51

S. B. No. 265 Page 3
As Introduced
division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the 52
bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall 53
conduct a criminal records check with respect to any person who 54
has applied for employment in a position for which a criminal 55
records check is required by those sections. The superintendent 56
shall conduct the criminal records check in the manner described 57
in division (B) of this section to determine whether any 58
information exists that indicates that the person who is the 59
subject of the request previously has been convicted of or 60
pleaded guilty to any of the following: 61
(a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 62
2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 63
2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.11, 2905.12, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.05, 64
2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.12, 2907.25, 2907.31, 65
2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2911.01, 2911.02, 66
2911.11, 2911.12, 2911.13, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.11, 67
2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.40, 2913.43, 2913.47, 2913.51, 2919.25, 68
2921.36, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.11, 69
2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code; 70
(b) An existing or former law of this state, any other 71
state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to 72
any of the offenses listed in division (A)(2)(a) of this 73
section. 74
(3) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 173.27, 75
173.38, 173.381, 3740.11, 5119.34, 5164.34, 5164.341, 5164.342, 76
5123.081, or 5123.169 of the Revised Code, a completed form 77
prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a 78
set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described 79
in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the 80
bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall 81

S. B. No. 265 Page 4
As Introduced
conduct a criminal records check of the person for whom the 82
request is made. The superintendent shall conduct the criminal 83
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 84
section to determine whether any information exists that 85
indicates that the person who is the subject of the request 86
previously has been convicted of, has pleaded guilty to, or 87
(except in the case of a request pursuant to section 5164.34, 88
5164.341, or 5164.342 of the Revised Code) has been found 89
eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for any of the 90
following, regardless of the date of the conviction, the date of 91
entry of the guilty plea, or (except in the case of a request 92
pursuant to section 5164.34, 5164.341, or 5164.342 of the 93
Revised Code) the date the person was found eligible for 94
intervention in lieu of conviction: 95
(a) A violation of section 959.13, 959.131, 2903.01, 96
2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 97
2903.15, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.211, 2903.22, 2903.34, 2903.341, 98
2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.11, 2905.12, 2905.32, 2905.33, 99
2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 100
2907.09, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.24, 2907.25, 2907.31, 101
2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2907.33, 2909.02, 102
2909.03, 2909.04, 2909.22, 2909.23, 2909.24, 2911.01, 2911.02, 103
2911.11, 2911.12, 2911.13, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.05, 104
2913.11, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.32, 2913.40, 2913.41, 2913.42, 105
2913.43, 2913.44, 2913.441, 2913.45, 2913.46, 2913.47, 2913.48, 106
2913.49, 2913.51, 2917.01, 2917.02, 2917.03, 2917.31, 2919.12, 107
2919.121, 2919.123, 2919.124, 2919.22, 2919.23, 2919.24, 108
2919.25, 2921.03, 2921.11, 2921.12, 2921.13, 2921.21, 2921.24, 109
2921.32, 2921.321, 2921.34, 2921.35, 2921.36, 2921.51, 2923.12, 110
2923.122, 2923.123, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2923.162, 2923.21, 111
2923.32, 2923.42, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.041, 2925.05, 112

S. B. No. 265 Page 5
As Introduced
2925.06, 2925.09, 2925.11, 2925.13, 2925.14, 2925.22, 2925.23, 113
2925.24, 2925.36, 2925.55, 2925.56, 2927.12, or 3716.11 of the 114
Revised Code; 115
(b) Felonious sexual penetration in violation of former 116
section 2907.12 of the Revised Code; 117
(c) A violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as 118
it existed prior to July 1, 1996; 119
(d) A violation of section 2923.01, 2923.02, or 2923.03 of 120
the Revised Code when the underlying offense that is the object 121
of the conspiracy, attempt, or complicity is one of the offenses 122
listed in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (c) of this section; 123
(e) A violation of an existing or former municipal 124
ordinance or law of this state, any other state, or the United 125
States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses 126
listed in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (d) of this section. 127
(4) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 2151.86, 128
2151.904, or 5103.053 of the Revised Code, a completed form 129
prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a 130
set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described 131
in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the 132
bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall 133
conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in 134
division (B) of this section to determine whether any 135
information exists that indicates that the person who is the 136
subject of the request previously has been convicted of or 137
pleaded guilty to any of the following: 138
(a) A violation of section 959.13, 959.131, 959.15, 139
959.16, 959.21, 2151.421, 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 140
2903.041, 2903.06, 2903.08, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.15, 141

S. B. No. 265 Page 6
As Introduced
2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.211, 2903.22, 2903.32, 2903.34, 2905.01, 142
2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.32, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 143
2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.19, 2907.21, 2907.22, 144
2907.23, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 145
2907.323, 2909.02, 2909.03, 2909.22, 2909.23, 2909.24, 2911.01, 146
2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2913.49, 2917.01, 2917.02, 2919.12, 147
2919.22, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2923.17, 148
2923.21, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.041, 2925.05, 2925.06, 149
2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, 2925.24, 2925.31, 2925.32, 2925.36, 150
2925.37, 2927.12, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code, a violation of 151
section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 152
1, 1996, a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that 153
would have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised 154
Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation been 155
committed prior to that date, a violation of section 2925.11 of 156
the Revised Code that is not a minor drug possession offense, 157
two or more OVI or OVUAC violations committed within the three 158
years immediately preceding the submission of the application or 159
petition that is the basis of the request, or felonious sexual 160
penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the 161
Revised Code, or a violation of Chapter 2919. of the Revised 162
Code that is a felony; 163
(b) A violation of an existing or former law of this 164
state, any other state, or the United States that is 165
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in 166
division (A)(4)(a) of this section. 167
(5) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to section 5104.013 168
of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to 169
division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint 170
impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) 171
of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 172

S. B. No. 265 Page 7
As Introduced
identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal 173
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 174
section to determine whether any information exists that 175
indicates that the person who is the subject of the request has 176
been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: 177
(a) A violation of section 2151.421, 2903.01, 2903.02, 178
2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 179
2903.22, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.11, 2905.32, 180
2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 181
2907.09, 2907.19, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.24, 2907.25, 182
2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2909.02, 183
2909.03, 2909.04, 2909.05, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 184
2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.041, 2913.05, 2913.06, 2913.11, 185
2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.32, 2913.33, 2913.34, 2913.40, 2913.41, 186
2913.42, 2913.43, 2913.44, 2913.441, 2913.45, 2913.46, 2913.47, 187
2913.48, 2913.49, 2917.01, 2917.02, 2917.03, 2917.31, 2919.12, 188
2919.22, 2919.224, 2919.225, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2921.03, 2921.11, 189
2921.13, 2921.14, 2921.34, 2921.35, 2923.01, 2923.12, 2923.13, 190
2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.06, or 191
3716.11 of the Revised Code, felonious sexual penetration in 192
violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code, a 193
violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed 194
prior to July 1, 1996, a violation of section 2919.23 of the 195
Revised Code that would have been a violation of section 2905.04 196
of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the 197
violation been committed prior to that date, a violation of 198
section 2925.11 of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug 199
possession offense, a violation of section 2923.02 or 2923.03 of 200
the Revised Code that relates to a crime specified in this 201
division, or a second violation of section 4511.19 of the 202
Revised Code within five years of the date of application for 203

S. B. No. 265 Page 8
As Introduced
licensure or certification. 204
(b) A violation of an existing or former law of this 205
state, any other state, or the United States that is 206
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses or violations 207
described in division (A)(5)(a) of this section. 208
(6) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to section 5153.111 209
of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to 210
division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint 211
impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) 212
of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 213
identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal 214
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 215
section to determine whether any information exists that 216
indicates that the person who is the subject of the request 217
previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the 218
following: 219
(a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 220
2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 221
2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 222
2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 223
2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 224
2909.02, 2909.03, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2919.12, 225
2919.22, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 226
2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.06, or 3716.11 of the Revised 227
Code, felonious sexual penetration in violation of former 228
section 2907.12 of the Revised Code, a violation of section 229
2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, 230
a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that would 231
have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as 232
it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation been 233

S. B. No. 265 Page 9
As Introduced
committed prior to that date, or a violation of section 2925.11 234
of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug possession offense; 235
(b) A violation of an existing or former law of this 236
state, any other state, or the United States that is 237
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in 238
division (A)(6)(a) of this section. 239
(7) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check 240
from an individual pursuant to section 4749.03 or 4749.06 of the 241
Revised Code, accompanied by a completed copy of the form 242
prescribed in division (C)(1) of this section and a set of 243
fingerprint impressions obtained in a manner described in 244
division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the 245
bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall 246
conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in 247
division (B) of this section to determine whether any 248
information exists indicating that the person who is the subject 249
of the request has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any 250
criminal offense in this state or in any other state. If the 251
individual indicates that a firearm will be carried in the 252
course of business, the superintendent shall require information 253
from the federal bureau of investigation as described in 254
division (B)(2) of this section. Subject to division (F) of this 255
section, the superintendent shall report the findings of the 256
criminal records check and any information the federal bureau of 257
investigation provides to the director of public safety. 258
(8) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 1321.37, 259
1321.53, or 4763.05 of the Revised Code, a completed form 260
prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a 261
set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described 262
in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the 263

S. B. No. 265 Page 10
As Introduced
bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall 264
conduct a criminal records check with respect to any person who 265
has applied for a license, permit, or certification from the 266
department of commerce or a division in the department. The 267
superintendent shall conduct the criminal records check in the 268
manner described in division (B) of this section to determine 269
whether any information exists that indicates that the person 270
who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted 271
of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in this state, any 272
other state, or the United States. 273
(9) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check 274
from the treasurer of state under section 113.041 of the Revised 275
Code or from an individual under section 928.03, 4701.08, 276
4715.101, 4717.061, 4725.121, 4725.501, 4729.071, 4729.53, 277
4729.90, 4729.92, 4730.101, 4730.14, 4730.28, 4731.081, 4731.15, 278
4731.171, 4731.222, 4731.281, 4731.531, 4732.091, 4734.202, 279
4740.061, 4741.10, 4747.051, 4751.20, 4751.201, 4751.21, 280
4753.061, 4755.70, 4757.101, 4759.061, 4760.032, 4760.06, 281
4761.051, 4762.031, 4762.06, 4774.031, 4774.06, 4776.021, 282
4778.04, 4778.07, 4779.091, or 4783.04 of the Revised Code, 283
accompanied by a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) 284
of this section and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in 285
the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the 286
superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and 287
investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the 288
manner described in division (B) of this section to determine 289
whether any information exists that indicates that the person 290
who is the subject of the request has been convicted of or 291
pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in this state or any 292
other state. Subject to division (F) of this section, the 293
superintendent shall send the results of a check requested under 294

S. B. No. 265 Page 11
As Introduced
section 113.041 of the Revised Code to the treasurer of state 295
and shall send the results of a check requested under any of the 296
other listed sections to the licensing board specified by the 297
individual in the request. 298
(10) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 124.74, 299
718.131, 1121.23, 1315.141, 1733.47, or 1761.26 of the Revised 300
Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of 301
this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in 302
the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the 303
superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and 304
investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the 305
manner described in division (B) of this section to determine 306
whether any information exists that indicates that the person 307
who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted 308
of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense under any existing 309
or former law of this state, any other state, or the United 310
States. 311
(11) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check 312
from an appointing or licensing authority under section 3772.07 313
of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division 314
(C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions 315
obtained in the manner prescribed in division (C)(2) of this 316
section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 317
identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal 318
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 319
section to determine whether any information exists that 320
indicates that the person who is the subject of the request 321
previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or no contest 322
to any offense under any existing or former law of this state, 323
any other state, or the United States that makes the person 324
ineligible for appointment or retention under section 3772.07 of 325

S. B. No. 265 Page 12
As Introduced
the Revised Code or that is a disqualifying offense as defined 326
in that section or substantially equivalent to a disqualifying 327
offense, as applicable. 328
(12) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 2151.33 329
or 2151.412 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed 330
pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of 331
fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in 332
division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the 333
bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall 334
conduct a criminal records check with respect to any person for 335
whom a criminal records check is required under that section. 336
The superintendent shall conduct the criminal records check in 337
the manner described in division (B) of this section to 338
determine whether any information exists that indicates that the 339
person who is the subject of the request previously has been 340
convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: 341
(a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 342
2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 343
2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.11, 2905.12, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.05, 344
2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.12, 2907.25, 2907.31, 345
2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2911.01, 2911.02, 346
2911.11, 2911.12, 2911.13, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.11, 347
2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.40, 2913.43, 2913.47, 2913.51, 2919.25, 348
2921.36, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.11, 349
2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code; 350
(b) An existing or former law of this state, any other 351
state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to 352
any of the offenses listed in division (A)(12)(a) of this 353
section. 354
(13) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 3796.12 355

S. B. No. 265 Page 13
As Introduced
of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to 356
division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint 357
impressions obtained in a manner described in division (C)(2) of 358
this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 359
identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal 360
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 361
section to determine whether any information exists that 362
indicates that the person who is the subject of the request 363
previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a 364
disqualifying offense as specified in rules adopted under 365
section 9.79 and division (B)(2)(b) of section 3796.03 of the 366
Revised Code if the person who is the subject of the request is 367
an administrator or other person responsible for the daily 368
operation of, or an owner or prospective owner, officer or 369
prospective officer, or board member or prospective board member 370
of, an entity seeking a license from the department of commerce 371
under Chapter 3796. of the Revised Code. 372
(14) On receipt of a request required by section 3796.13 373
of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to 374
division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint 375
impressions obtained in a manner described in division (C)(2) of 376
this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 377
identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal 378
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 379
section to determine whether any information exists that 380
indicates that the person who is the subject of the request 381
previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a 382
disqualifying offense as specified in rules adopted under 383
division (B)(14)(a) of section 3796.03 of the Revised Code if 384
the person who is the subject of the request is seeking 385
employment with an entity licensed by the department of commerce 386

S. B. No. 265 Page 14
As Introduced
under Chapter 3796. of the Revised Code. 387
(15) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 4768.06 388
of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division 389
(C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions 390
obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this 391
section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 392
identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal 393
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 394
section to determine whether any information exists indicating 395
that the person who is the subject of the request has been 396
convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in this 397
state or in any other state. 398
(16) On receipt of a request pursuant to division (B) of 399
section 4764.07 or division (A) of section 4735.143 of the 400
Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) 401
of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained 402
in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the 403
superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and 404
investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the 405
manner described in division (B) of this section to determine 406
whether any information exists indicating that the person who is 407
the subject of the request has been convicted of or pleaded 408
guilty to any criminal offense in any state or the United 409
States. 410
(17) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check 411
under section 147.022 of the Revised Code, a completed form 412
prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of 413
fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner prescribed in 414
division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the 415
bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall 416

S. B. No. 265 Page 15
As Introduced
conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in 417
division (B) of this section to determine whether any 418
information exists that indicates that the person who is the 419
subject of the request previously has been convicted of or 420
pleaded guilty or no contest to any criminal offense under any 421
existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the 422
United States. 423
(18) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to division (F) of 424
section 2915.081 or division (E) of section 2915.082 of the 425
Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) 426
of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained 427
in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the 428
superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and 429
investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the 430
manner described in division (B) of this section to determine 431
whether any information exists indicating that the person who is 432
the subject of the request has been convicted of or pleaded 433
guilty or no contest to any offense that is a violation of 434
Chapter 2915. of the Revised Code or to any offense under any 435
existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the 436
United States that is substantially equivalent to such an 437
offense. 438
(19) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 3775.03 439
of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division 440
(C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions 441
obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this 442
section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 443
identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal 444
records check in the manner described in division (B) of this 445
section and shall request information from the federal bureau of 446
investigation to determine whether any information exists 447

S. B. No. 265 Page 16
As Introduced
indicating that the person who is the subject of the request has 448
been convicted of any offense under any existing or former law 449
of this state, any other state, or the United States that is a 450
disqualifying offense as defined in section 3772.07 of the 451
Revised Code. 452
(B) Subject to division (F) of this section, the 453
superintendent shall conduct any criminal records check to be 454
conducted under this section as follows: 455
(1) The superintendent shall review or cause to be 456
reviewed any relevant information gathered and compiled by the 457
bureau under division (A) of section 109.57 of the Revised Code 458
that relates to the person who is the subject of the criminal 459
records check, including, if the criminal records check was 460
requested under section 113.041, 121.08, 124.74, 173.27, 173.38, 461
173.381, 718.131, 928.03, 1121.23, 1315.141, 1321.37, 1321.53, 462
1733.47, 1761.26, 2151.86, 3301.32, 3301.541, 3319.39, 3740.11, 463
3712.09, 3721.121, 3772.07, 3775.03, 3796.12, 3796.13, 4729.071, 464
4729.53, 4729.90, 4729.92, 4749.03, 4749.06, 4763.05, 4764.07, 465
4768.06, 5103.053, 5104.013, 5164.34, 5164.341, 5164.342, 466
5123.081, 5123.169, or 5153.111 of the Revised Code, any 467
relevant information contained in records that have been sealed 468
under section 2953.32 of the Revised Code; 469
(2) If the request received by the superintendent asks for 470
information from the federal bureau of investigation, the 471
superintendent shall request from the federal bureau of 472
investigation any information it has with respect to the person 473
who is the subject of the criminal records check, including 474
fingerprint-based checks of national crime information databases 475
as described in 42 U.S.C. 671 if the request is made pursuant to 476
section 2151.86, 5103.053, or 5104.013 of the Revised Code or if 477

S. B. No. 265 Page 17
As Introduced
any other Revised Code section requires fingerprint-based checks 478
of that nature, and shall review or cause to be reviewed any 479
information the superintendent receives from that bureau. If a 480
request under section 3319.39 of the Revised Code asks only for 481
information from the federal bureau of investigation, the 482
superintendent shall not conduct the review prescribed by 483
division (B)(1) of this section. 484
(3) The superintendent or the superintendent's designee 485
may request criminal history records from other states or the 486
federal government pursuant to the national crime prevention and 487
privacy compact set forth in section 109.571 of the Revised 488
Code. 489
(4) The superintendent shall include in the results of the 490
criminal records check a list or description of the offenses 491
listed or described in the relevant provision of division (A) of 492
this section. The superintendent shall exclude from the results 493
any information the dissemination of which is prohibited by 494
federal law. 495
(5) The superintendent shall send the results of the 496
criminal records check to the person to whom it is to be sent 497
not later than the following number of days after the date the 498
superintendent receives the request for the criminal records 499
check, the completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of 500
this section, and the set of fingerprint impressions obtained in 501
the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section: 502
(a) If the superintendent is required by division (A) of 503
this section (other than division (A)(3) of this section) to 504
conduct the criminal records check, thirty; 505
(b) If the superintendent is required by division (A)(3) 506

S. B. No. 265 Page 18
As Introduced
of this section to conduct the criminal records check, sixty. 507
(C)(1) The superintendent shall prescribe a form to obtain 508
the information necessary to conduct a criminal records check 509
from any person for whom a criminal records check is to be 510
conducted under this section. The form that the superintendent 511
prescribes pursuant to this division may be in a tangible 512
format, in an electronic format, or in both tangible and 513
electronic formats. 514
(2) The superintendent shall prescribe standard impression 515
sheets to obtain the fingerprint impressions of any person for 516
whom a criminal records check is to be conducted under this 517
section. Any person for whom a records check is to be conducted 518
under this section shall obtain the fingerprint impressions at a 519
county sheriff's office, municipal police department, or any 520
other entity with the ability to make fingerprint impressions on 521
the standard impression sheets prescribed by the superintendent. 522
The office, department, or entity may charge the person a 523
reasonable fee for making the impressions. The standard 524
impression sheets the superintendent prescribes pursuant to this 525
division may be in a tangible format, in an electronic format, 526
or in both tangible and electronic formats. 527
(3) Subject to division (D) of this section, the 528
superintendent shall prescribe and charge a reasonable fee for 529
providing a criminal records check under this section. The 530
person requesting the criminal records check shall pay the fee 531
prescribed pursuant to this division. In the case of a request 532
under section 1121.23, 1155.03, 1163.05, 1315.141, 1733.47, 533
1761.26, 2151.33, 2151.412, or 5164.34 of the Revised Code, the 534
fee shall be paid in the manner specified in that section. 535
(4) The superintendent of the bureau of criminal 536

S. B. No. 265 Page 19
As Introduced
identification and investigation may prescribe methods of 537
forwarding fingerprint impressions and information necessary to 538
conduct a criminal records check, which methods shall include, 539
but not be limited to, an electronic method. 540
(D) The results of a criminal records check conducted 541
under this section, other than a criminal records check 542
specified in division (A)(7) of this section, are valid for the 543
person who is the subject of the criminal records check for a 544
period of one year from the date upon which the superintendent 545
completes the criminal records check. If during that period the 546
superintendent receives another request for a criminal records 547
check to be conducted under this section for that person, the 548
superintendent shall provide the results from the previous 549
criminal records check of the person at a lower fee than the fee 550
prescribed for the initial criminal records check. 551
(E) When the superintendent receives a request for 552
information from a registered private provider, the 553
superintendent shall proceed as if the request was received from 554
a school district board of education under section 3319.39 of 555
the Revised Code. The superintendent shall apply division (A)(1) 556
(c) of this section to any such request for an applicant who is 557
a teacher. 558
(F)(1) Subject to division (F)(2) of this section, all 559
information regarding the results of a criminal records check 560
conducted under this section that the superintendent reports or 561
sends under division (A)(7) or (9) of this section to the 562
director of public safety, the treasurer of state, or the 563
person, board, or entity that made the request for the criminal 564
records check shall relate to the conviction of the subject 565
person, or the subject person's plea of guilty to, a criminal 566

S. B. No. 265 Page 20
As Introduced
offense. 567
(2) Division (F)(1) of this section does not limit, 568
restrict, or preclude the superintendent's release of 569
information that relates to the arrest of a person who is 570
eighteen years of age or older, to an adjudication of a child as 571
a delinquent child, or to a criminal conviction of a person 572
under eighteen years of age in circumstances in which a release 573
of that nature is authorized under division (E)(2), (3), or (4) 574
of section 109.57 of the Revised Code pursuant to a rule adopted 575
under division (E)(1) of that section. 576
(G) As used in this section: 577
(1) "Criminal records check" means any criminal records 578
check conducted by the superintendent of the bureau of criminal 579
identification and investigation in accordance with division (B) 580
of this section. 581
(2) "Minor drug possession offense" has the same meaning 582
as in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code. 583
(3) "OVI or OVUAC violation" means a violation of section 584
4511.19 of the Revised Code or a violation of an existing or 585
former law of this state, any other state, or the United States 586
that is substantially equivalent to section 4511.19 of the 587
Revised Code. 588
(4) "Registered private provider" means a nonpublic school 589
or entity registered with the department of education and 590
workforce under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code to 591
participate in the autism scholarship program or section 3310.58 592
of the Revised Code to participate in the Jon Peterson special 593
needs scholarship program. 594
Section 2. That existing section 109.572 of the Revised 595

S. B. No. 265 Page 21
As Introduced
Code is hereby repealed. 596